Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 90 High School Outcomes Improvement Act of 2009
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-90-1.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “High School Outcomes Improvement Act of 2009.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 204, § 1.

16-90-2.
Findings of fact.

The general assembly makes the following findings of fact:.

The high schools of the state of Rhode Island play an integral role in preparing students for college and work in the 21st century. The high school outcomes improvement act recognizes that high school success is more important than ever for the health of our economy, for civic life, and to ensure equal opportunity. It is of critical importance to the success of our public high schools to prepare all students for college and work in the 21st century.

Without accurate data on graduation rates it is extremely difficult to evaluate the efficacy of the state’s system of public education. Better information can lead to better policies and program implementation.

Parents and community members, who are critical to ensuring strong educational accountability, are hampered in their efforts to improve our schools if they do not have accurate data.

It is of critical importance that accurate data be collected, maintained, analyzed and publicly reported by our state’s education system with respect to high school student graduation rates.

In the state of Rhode Island, existing data from independent researchers indicates that when graduation rates are broken down by racial and ethnic group, by students with disabilities compared to their non-disabled peers, by English language learners and by socio-economically disadvantaged students compared to non-disadvantaged peers, that many of these sub-groups are experiencing particularly low rates of high school graduation.

Ultimately, the state of Rhode Island is committed to develop and implement a student-unit-record data system, with unique student identifiers that can track students through the state’s education system from kindergarten through post-secondary education.

The state must commit to developing and maintaining a data and public reporting system that accurately accounts for all students when calculating high school graduation rates and informs the public of progress toward the goal of universal high school graduation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 204, § 1.

16-90-3.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to initiate a process by which the state may achieve the goal of collecting, maintaining, analyzing and reporting of data relating to the graduation rates of the students in our public high schools as an essential step in addressing gaps in educational achievement among our diverse student population.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 204, § 1.

16-90-4.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases used in this chapter shall have the following meanings unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“High School Graduation Rate” is defined as the percentage of the “four (4) year adjusted cohort” who attended high school in the school district, and earned a regular high school diploma “on time” as calculated using the “graduation rate formula.”

“Graduation Rate Formula” defines the formula for calculating the graduation rate as the number of students who earned an “on time” diploma divided by the number of students who formed the four (4) year adjusted cohort for that graduation class. It may be expressed as follows: Graduation rate= (On time graduates in year x) divided by (the number of students who entered grade 9 together in year x-4) + (transfers) — (transfers out and deceased).

“On Time” means that students who earned a regular high school diploma from the district at the conclusion of their fourth (4th) year or before. This may include graduates who earned their diploma during a senior summer session in those districts offering summer sessions for seniors.

“Four-Year Adjusted Cohort” is defined as the students who entered grade 9 together; and, any students that transferred into the district in grade 10 through 12. Students that the district can confirm have either transferred out of the district, or are deceased, are removed from the cohort. All other students, including those retained in grade, those who enroll in a GED program, or take leave of school for any other reason, are not counted as transfers and remain in the “four-year adjusted cohort.” Students who are retained in grade, or take leave of school and return are counted only once as part of their initial “four-year adjusted cohort.”

“Transfers In” are students who entered any high school after the beginning of the entering cohort’s first year in high school in the district up to and including grade 12.

“Transfers Out” are students the district can confirm with supporting documentation as having transferred out of the district to enroll in another high school outside the district, or other educational program for which they are expected to receive a regular high school diploma. Confirmation of transfer to another school/program shall be in the form of formal, written documentation that the student enrolled in the receiving school. “Transfers Out” does not include students enrolled in a GED or other alternative educational program that does not issue or provide credits toward the issuance of a regular high school diploma.

“Board of Regents” means the state board of regents for elementary and secondary education established in chapter 16-60.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 204, § 1.

16-90-5.
Implementation.

Duties and responsibilities imposed by the statute with respect to the state’s adoption, public reporting and implementation, with respect to the public high schools in the state, of a standard four (4) year adjusted cohort graduation rate using the defined formula.

Within ninety (90) days of the effective date of this act, the board of regents, in conjunction with each local school board, district, or agency, shall adopt and implement a standard four (4) year adjusted cohort graduation rate definition and data collection protocol using the graduation rate formula as defined in this chapter.

Students who enroll in a GED or any other alternative educational program that does not issue or provide credits toward the issuance of a regular high school diploma are not “transfers out” and remain in the cohort for the purpose of graduation rate calculations described in this chapter.

The board of regents, in conjunction with each local school board, district, or agency shall develop and retain capacity for collection, analysis, and public reporting of public high school graduation rate data. Graduation rates shall be calculated and publicly reported for each school, school district and for the state. Graduation rates shall be calculated and publicly reported in the aggregate and disaggregated by the major racial and ethnic groups, for students with disabilities, for English language learners, for socio-economically disadvantaged students, and for non-socio-economically disadvantaged students.

The state’s education system, in conjunction with local school with school districts, is encouraged to develop and implement one or more complementary indicators to enhance the state’s ability to measure and report different forms of high school completion, including: five (5) and six (6) year graduation rates; dropout rates; retention rates; completion rates; and college-ready graduation rates. The board of regents shall develop consistent definitions to ensure that these measures are reported in comparable ways across schools and districts within the state. These additional indicators will not replace or be presented or treated as an alternative to the graduation rate delineated in this chapter.

Nothing in this chapter should be construed as limiting the reporting on a variety of other indices of school completion such as dropout rates, five (5) and six (6) year graduation rates, and other school completion rates recommended for development in this chapter.

The board of regents shall take the necessary steps to inculcate in the overall mission of the state’s education system, the importance of collecting, maintaining, analyzing, and publicly reporting at the state and district level, accurate and disaggregated data on the graduation rates of public high schools at the district and school level. These steps include, but are not limited to, mandatory training for all school district administrators, registrars and other school-and district-based personnel with responsibility for collecting and maintaining data on cohorts and graduation rates. In addition, the board of regents shall implement a system for verifying the accuracy of locally reported graduation-rate data that shall include statistical checks and analyses along with on-site audits of record-keeping procedures to ensure that schools and districts adhere to state standards and guidelines.

The board of regents shall take the necessary steps to educate the public as to the need for the state’s education system to be able to collect, maintain, analyze, and report publicly, accurate data on the graduation rates of public high schools and school districts. Such steps shall include, but not be limited to, outreach to civic associations, community based groups, and parents organizations to educate them about the need for accurate graduation rates, to inform them of the reporting and assistance to be implemented by the state, and to solicit suggestions and community support.

The board of regents shall collaborate with local governments in the process of adopting and implementing the public high school graduation rate required by this section. This collaboration shall include the calculation and public reporting of an interim graduation rate until such time as the state and local governments have all the data required to fully implement the cohort graduation rate definition mandated by this chapter. This interim graduation rate shall be the ratio of diploma recipients in the given year to ninth (9th) grade enrollment four (4) years prior.

The interim graduation rate mandated in this chapter shall be used as the additional high school indicator for the purposes of determining a high school’s adequate yearly progress status under the No Child Left Behind Act of 2001 until such time as the cohort graduation rate, mandated by this chapter is implemented upon implementation of the cohort graduation rate. This rate shall be used as the additional high school indicator for the purposes of determining a high school’s adequate yearly progress status under the No Child Left Behind Act of 2001.

This chapter applies only to graduation rate data for students who attend public high schools in Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 204, § 1.

16-90-6.
Reporting Requirements.

Within ninety (90) days of the effective date of this statute, the board of regents shall submit a report to the governor and the general assembly on the implementation of the adoption and implementation of the four (4) year cohort graduation rate formula. The report shall describe the interim measures the state is taking. The report should also detail each category, code and the corresponding definitions that the state has authorized for identifying, tracking, calculating and publicly reporting transfers out. This report shall be released to the public and posted on the state education department’s publicly accessible web page contemporaneous with submission to the governor and the general assembly.

On or before November 1st of each year, the board of regents shall submit a report to the governor and the general assembly on its efforts to collect, maintain, analyze, and publicly report high school graduation rates, and how the steps taken by that system comply with other appropriate provisions of this section. This report shall describe the statistical analyses and data verification activities undertaken by the state to confirm the accuracy of reported graduation rates, and shall detail any discrepancies identified. This report shall be released to the public and posted on the state education department’s publicly accessible web page contemporaneous with submission to the governor and legislature.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 204, § 1.